Texas statutes.
FINANCE CODE

TITLE 3. FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS AND BUSINESSES

SUBTITLE F. TRUST COMPANIES

CHAPTER 199. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 199.001. SLANDER OR LIBEL OF STATE TRUST COMPANY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) knowingly makes, circulates, or transmits to another person an untrue statement that is derogatory to the financial condition of a state trust company located in this state; or

(2) intentionally, to injure the state trust company, counsels, aids, procures, or induces another person to knowingly make, circulate, or transmit to another person an untrue statement that is derogatory to the financial condition of a state trust company located in this state.

(b) An offense under this section is a state jail felony.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 7.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 199.002. AUTHORITY TO ACT AS NOTARY PUBLIC. A notary public is not disqualified from taking an acknowledgment or proof of a written instrument as provided by Section 406.016, Government Code, solely because of the person's ownership of stock or participation interest in or employment by a trust institution that is an interested party in the underlying transaction, including a state trust company or a trust institution organized under the laws of another state that lawfully maintains an office in this state.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 7.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 6.023(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 199.003. SUCCESSION OF TRUST POWERS. (a) If, at the time of a merger, reorganization, conversion, sale of substantially all of its assets under Chapter 182 or 187 or other applicable law, or sale of substantially all of its trust accounts and related activities at a separate branch or trust office, a reorganizing or selling state trust company is acting as trustee, guardian, executor, or administrator, or in another fiduciary capacity, a successor or purchasing trust institution with sufficient fiduciary authority may continue the office, trust, or fiduciary relationship:

(1) without the necessity of judicial action or action by the creator of the office, trust, or fiduciary relationship; and

(2) without regard to whether the successor or purchasing trust institution meets qualification requirements specified in an instrument creating the office, trust, or fiduciary relationship other than a requirement related to geographic locale of account administration, including requirements as to jurisdiction of incorporation, location of principal office, or type of financial institution.

(b) The successor or purchasing trust institution may perform all the duties and exercise all the powers connected with or incidental to the fiduciary relationship in the same manner as if the successor or purchasing trust institution had been originally designated as the fiduciary.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 7.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 6.024(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 199.004. DISCOVERY OF CLIENT RECORDS. Civil discovery of a client record maintained by a trust institution, including a state trust company or a trust institution organized under the laws of another state that lawfully maintains an office in this state, is governed by Section 59.006.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 7.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 6.025(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 199.005. COMPLIANCE REVIEW COMMITTEE. A trust company may establish a compliance review committee as provided by Section 59.009.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 7.16(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 6.026(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.